Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 3

Qualifications and Licensing

62-13-301. License requirement.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, to engage in or conduct, to advertise or claim to be engaging in or conducting the business, or acting in the capacity of a real estate broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent, as defined in § 62-13-102, within this state, without first obtaining a license as broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent, as provided in this chapter, unless exempted from obtaining a license under § 62-13-104. No person shall be permitted to hold, at the same time, an active time-share salesperson license and an active acquisition agent license.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 2; 1981, ch. 473, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-1303; Acts 1989, ch. 89, § 7; 2002, ch. 812, § 2; 2004, ch. 456, § 1.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

License required for certain persons at auctions acting as brokers or affiliate brokers, § 62-19-102.

Real estate appraiser, title 62, ch. 39.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 4; 20 Tenn. Juris., Pleading, § 15; 25 Tenn. Juris., Waiver, § 5.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of Time-Sharing and the Tennessee Time-Share Act: Are Purchasers Now Protected?, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 779 (1986).

62-13-302. Employment by broker of unlicensed broker or broker in another state.

It is unlawful for any licensed broker to employ or compensate any person who is not a licensed broker or a licensed affiliate broker for performing any of the acts regulated by this chapter. A licensed broker may pay a commission to a licensed broker of another state if the nonresident broker does not conduct in this state any of the negotiations for which a commission is paid.

A real estate licensee shall not give or pay cash rebates, cash gifts or cash prizes in conjunction with any real estate transaction. As part of the Tennessee real estate commission's general rulemaking authority the commission may regulate the practices of real estate licensees regarding gifts, prizes or rebates that are not otherwise prohibited by law.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 13(a); T.C.A., § 62-1306; Acts 2007, ch. 266, § 1.

62-13-303. Qualifications — Prerequisites for licensing.

Licenses shall be granted only to persons who bear a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness, integrity and competence to transact the business of broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson in a manner to safeguard the interest of the public and only after satisfactory proof of such qualifications has been presented to the commission. No license shall be denied any person because of race, color, religion, sex or national origin.

All applicants for an affiliate real estate broker's license must provide adequate proof to the commission that they have a high school degree or a general educational development (GED(R)) certificate.

All affiliate brokers must complete a Tennessee real estate commission-approved thirty (30) hours of education in specified areas, including contract writing, handling consumer deposits, listing property, agency disclosures or other areas designated by the commission within six (6) months of obtaining their affiliate broker's license. Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this chapter, if the required thirty (30) hours of education are not obtained and proof of compliance provided to the commission within the six-month period, the affiliate broker's license shall automatically expire at the end of the six-month period.

The education requirements specified in this subsection (a), in addition to any other education requirements specified in this chapter to be completed by an applicant prior to licensure, shall be completed by an applicant for an affiliate broker's license prior to the original license being issued. This education requirement is in addition to any continuing education requirements specified in this chapter or the rules of the commission.

Any person who desires an affiliate broker's license shall submit an application for examination to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

The fee specified in § 62-13-308; and

Certification of satisfactory completion by the applicant of sixty (60) classroom hours in real estate at a school, college or university approved by the commission, including thirty (30) classroom hours covering the basic principles of real estate.

Any person who desires a broker's license shall submit an application for examination to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

The fee specified in § 62-13-308;

Certification of satisfactory completion by the applicant of one hundred twenty (120) classroom hours in real estate, before or after receipt of an affiliate broker's license, at a school, college or university approved by the commission, including thirty (30) classroom hours covering office or brokerage management; and

If the applicant was licensed as an affiliate broker after May 12, 1988, satisfactory proof that the applicant has held an active real estate license for at least thirty-six (36) months, or, if the applicant holds a baccalaureate degree with a major in real estate, for at least twenty-four (24) months; or

If the applicant was licensed as an affiliate broker on or before May 12, 1988, satisfactory proof that the applicant has been engaged as a real estate licensee for at least twenty-four (24) months, or, if the applicant holds a baccalaureate degree with a major in real estate, for at least twelve (12) months.

Each applicant who passes the examination shall submit an application for the appropriate license to the commission. If such application is not filed within six (6) months after the date of the examination passed, the applicant must retake and pass the examination in order to be eligible for a license.

An application for an affiliate broker's license shall be accompanied by:

The fee specified in § 62-13-308;

Satisfactory proof that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Has been a resident of this state for at least forty-five (45) days; and

A sworn statement by the broker with whom the applicant desires to be affiliated certifying that, in the broker's opinion, the applicant is honest and trustworthy and that the broker will actively supervise and train the applicant during the period the license remains in effect.

An application for a broker's license shall be accompanied by:

The fee specified in § 62-13-308; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Has been a resident of this state for at least forty-five (45) days.

Every two (2) years, as a requisite for the reissuance of an affiliate broker's license originally issued on or after July 1, 1980, the affiliate broker shall furnish certification of satisfactory completion of sixteen (16) classroom hours in real estate courses at any school, college or university approved by the commission.

Within a period of three (3) years from the date of issuance of an original broker's license, the licensee shall, as a requisite for the reissuance of the license, furnish certification of satisfactory completion of an additional one hundred twenty (120) classroom hours in real estate at any school, college or university approved by the commission. Beginning with the license period immediately following the license period in which the licensee completes the one hundred twenty (120) hours of education specified in this subsection (h), the licensee of a broker's license originally issued after January 1, 2005, every two (2) years shall furnish certification of satisfactory completion of sixteen (16) classroom hours in real estate courses at any school, college or university approved by the commission as a requisite for the reissuance of the license.

The commission shall, at least six (6) months prior to the deadline for furnishing the certification required by subsections (g) and (h), notify each licensee from whom the certification has not been received.

Any person who desires a time-share salesperson license shall submit an application for examination and license to the commission on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

The fees specified in § 62-13-308 for examination and license;

Satisfactory proof that the applicant is:

At least eighteen (18) years of age; and

A resident of this state;

A sworn statement by the broker with whom the applicant desires to be affiliated certifying that, in the broker's opinion, the applicant is honest and trustworthy and that the broker will actively supervise and train the applicant during the period the license remains in effect; and

Certification, by the broker with whom the applicant desires to be affiliated, stating that the applicant has completed a thirty (30) hour training program consisting of instruction in the fundamentals of the Tennessee Time-Share Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 32, part 1, and related topics.

Any person who desires an acquisition agent license shall submit an application for examination and license to the commission on the prescribed form.

The application shall be accompanied by:

The fees specified in § 62-13-308 for examination and license;

Proof satisfactory to the commission that the applicant is at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Proof satisfactory to the commission that the applicant is of good moral character.

Compliance by an acquisition agent with the licensing requirements of this section shall constitute compliance with the registration requirements contained in § 66-32-139.

The commission shall require all applicants for initial licensure issued under this chapter, including, but not limited to, a time-share license, on or after January 1, 2014, to submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the commission or in such electronic format as the commission may require, to the commission or to the Tennessee bureau of investigation for the purpose of obtaining a criminal background check from the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation.

The commission shall refuse to issue a license to an applicant for initial licensure who does not comply with subdivision (l )(1); provided, that a licensee who requests to renew an existing license issued under this chapter, or obtain a broker license after being licensed as an affiliate broker, shall not be required to submit a set of fingerprints pursuant to this subsection (l ).

The commission shall conduct a criminal background check of each applicant described in subdivision (l )(1) by using information:

Provided by the applicant under this subsection (l ); and

Made available to the commission by the Tennessee bureau of investigation, the federal bureau of investigation and any other criminal justice agency.

The commission may:

Enter into an agreement with the Tennessee bureau of investigation to administer a criminal background check required under this subsection (l ); and

Authorize the Tennessee bureau of investigation to collect from the applicant the costs incurred by the department in conducting the criminal background check.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 8(a)-(f); 1980, ch. 707, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1316; Acts 1982, ch. 589, § 3; 1982, ch. 864, §§ 1-4; 1984, ch. 810, § 1; 1987, ch. 419, § 3; 1988, ch. 919, §§ 2, 3; 1989, ch. 89, §§ 8, 9; 1989, ch. 242, § 1; 1989, ch. 324, § 3; 1993, ch. 103, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 812, § 5; 2003, ch. 233, § 1; 2003, ch. 234, § 1; 2013, ch. 420, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 420, § 2 provided that the Tennessee real estate commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with title 4, chapter 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee real estate commission education course approval. OAG 10-09, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/26/10).

Real estate licensing requirements for non-Tennessee residents. OAG 10-90, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (8/2/10).

62-13-304. Written examinations.

In addition to submitting proof of honesty, trustworthiness, integrity and good reputation, each applicant shall pass a written examination prepared by or under the supervision of the commission.

The examination may be given orally at the discretion of the commission if a written examination is precluded by reason of physical disability.

The examination shall be given at times and places within the state that the commission shall prescribe. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commission may administer the examination at requested locations and may charge special fees that the commission may deem appropriate.

The examination for a license shall include business ethics, composition, arithmetic, elementary principles of land economics and appraisal, closing statements, a general knowledge of the statutes of this state relating to deeds, mortgages, trust deeds, contracts of sale, leases and other related matters and the provisions of this chapter.

The examination for a broker's license shall be of more exacting nature and scope than the examination for an affiliate broker's license.

An applicant failing to pass an examination may be reexamined under rules that the commission may prescribe.

The examination for time-share salesperson license shall include the fundamentals of the time-share business, the Tennessee Time-Share Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 32, and other related topics including the parts of this chapter relative to time-share salespersons.

The minimum passing grade for the time-share salesperson examination shall be seventy percent (70%).

An application for the time-share salesperson license examination must be received by the commission at least ten (10) days before the examination date on which the applicant wishes to be examined.

The examination for an acquisition agent license shall be the same as the examination administered for a time-share salesperson license.

The minimum passing grade for an acquisition agent license examination shall be seventy percent (70%).

An application for the acquisition agent license examination must be received by the commission at least ten (10) days before the examination date on which the applicant wishes to be examined.

No applicant shall engage in the real estate business as a broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent until satisfactorily passing the examination and complying with other requirements of this chapter and until a license has been issued to the applicant. An applicant for a time-share salesperson license or acquisition agent license who has passed the examination for either license in the twelve-month period preceding the date of application shall be deemed to have satisfied the examination requirements for the pending application.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 9(a), (b); T.C.A., § 67-1317(a), (b); Acts 1989, ch. 89, §§ 10-12; 2002, ch. 812, §§ 6, 7; 2004, ch. 456, § 2; 2011, ch. 47, § 69.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

62-13-305, 62-13-306. [Reserved.]

All licenses issued under this chapter shall expire two (2) years from the date the license was issued or renewed. All documentation and fees that are a prerequisite to the renewal of a license or registration shall be delivered to the commission prior to the expiration date of the license.

The license of any broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson or acquisition agent who fails to deliver all documentation or to pay fees that are a prerequisite to the renewal of a license or registration no later than sixty (60) days prior to the expiration date of the license shall not be renewed except upon providing the documentation prior to the expiration date of the license and payment of the fees, plus a penalty fee of no more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month, or portion of a month, that the documentation or fees are late.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 12(f); 1979, ch. 148, § 1; 1981, ch. 473, § 8; T.C.A., 62-1320; Acts 1982, ch. 864, §§ 7, 18; 1984, ch. 810, § 2; 1988, ch. 919, § 4; 1989, ch. 89, § 13; 1989, ch. 360, § 7; 1990, ch. 1026, § 40; 2000, ch. 861, § 2; 2003, ch. 97, § 1; 2005, ch. 252, § 2; 2010, ch. 666, § 3.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-13-308. Examination and license fees.

The commission shall prescribe in its rules and regulations all fees to be paid before any examinations shall be given or licenses issued by the commission as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 11(a); 1980, ch. 870, § 5; 1981, ch. 473, § 9; T.C.A., § 62-1321; Acts 1984, ch. 810, § 3; 1989, ch. 89, §§ 14-16; 1989, ch. 523, § 148.

Cross-References. Real estate education and recovery account, § 62-13-208.

62-13-309. Business locations — Display of license — Signs.

Each office shall have a real estate firm license, a principal broker and a fixed location with adequate facilities for affiliated licensees, located to conform with zoning laws and ordinances.

Each branch location shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(A).

The license of a broker and of each affiliate broker under contract to the broker shall be prominently displayed in the broker's principal place of business.

Within ten (10) days after any change of location of the office, the principal broker registered at that office shall notify the commission in writing of the office's new business address and shall pay the fee established in § 62-13-308. The new address shall be considered the new business address for all brokers or affiliate brokers associated with the location unless any such brokers or affiliate brokers otherwise notify the commission of a new business address through a change of affiliation, termination of affiliation, or by other means acceptable to the commission.

Each licensed broker shall maintain a sign on the outside of the broker's office of the size and content that local ordinances and the commission prescribe, which shall clearly state that the broker is engaged in the real estate business.

In making application for a license or for a change of location, the licensee shall verify, in writing, that the licensee's office conforms with zoning laws and ordinances.

The maintenance of the broker's office in the broker's home shall not relieve the broker from the requirement of having a sign outside of the house as required in this subsection (b).

Affiliate brokers are not required to display signs at the office of their brokers.

The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) may be waived in cases of certain unusual geographical circumstances.

If the applicant for a broker's license maintains more than one (1) place of business within the state, the applicant shall apply for and obtain an additional firm license for each branch office.

Every application shall state the location of the branch office and the name of the person in charge of it.

Each branch office shall be under the direction and supervision of a broker licensed at that address.

No more than one (1) license shall be issued to any broker or affiliate broker to be in effect at one (1) time.

Upon original application for a firm license and each renewal of the license, the firm shall provide proof of the establishment of the firm's escrow account satisfactory to the commission.

A principal broker may act as a principal broker for two (2) firms as long as both firms are in the same location. As used in this subsection (g), “the same location” means that both firms are located at and use the same physical address.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 12(a), (b), (d); T.C.A., § 62-1323; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 16; 1988, ch. 919, §§ 5, 6; 1989, ch. 324, §§ 4, 5; 2009, ch. 97, § 1; 2017, ch. 226, § 6.

Cross-References. Levy of occupation tax on principal brokers, § 67-4-1708.

62-13-310. Affiliate broker relationship to broker.

Whenever the contractual relationship between a broker and affiliate broker is terminated, the present broker shall immediately sign and date the change of affiliation form prescribed by the commission. The affiliate broker may act under a contract with another broker upon completion and transmittal to the commission of the form, accompanied by the fee established pursuant to § 62-13-308. The affiliate broker shall assure that the completed form and fee are promptly transmitted and that the affiliate broker's license is prominently displayed in the new broker's principal place of business.

Licensees may not post signs on any property advertising themselves as real estate agents unless the firm's name appears on the signs in letters the same size or larger than those spelling out the name of the licensee.

Any unlawful act or violation of this chapter by any affiliate broker may not be cause for the suspension or revocation of the license of the broker with whom the affiliate broker is affiliated.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, §§ 12(c), (e), 16(b); 1981, ch. 473, §§ 10, 11; T.C.A., § 62-1324; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 8; 1990, ch. 946, § 5.

62-13-311. Revocation of license by court — Reinstatement.

Whenever any person, partnership, association, company, firm or corporation claiming to have been injured or damaged by the gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonesty or misconduct on the part of any licensee following the calling or engaging in the business described in this chapter files suit upon the claim against the licensee in any court of record in this state and recovers judgment on the claim, the court may as part of its judgment or decree in such cases, if it deem it a proper case in which so to do, revoke the certificate of license granted under this chapter, and the certificate of license shall not be reissued to the licensee except upon the consenting vote of six (6) of the members of the commission in favor of reissuance.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 15; T.C.A., § 62-1325; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 9.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 6.

62-13-312. Discipline — Refusal, revocation or suspension of license — Downgrading of licenses — Automatic revocation.

The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person setting forth a cause of action under this section, ascertain the facts and, if warranted, hold a hearing for reprimand or for the suspension or revocation of a license.

The commission shall have the power to refuse a license for cause or to suspend or revoke a license where it has been obtained by false representation or by fraudulent act or conduct, or where a licensee, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts mentioned herein, is found guilty of:

Making any substantial and willful misrepresentation;

Making any promise of a character likely to influence, persuade or induce any person to enter into any contract or agreement when the licensee could not or did not intend to keep the promise;

Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through affiliate brokers, other persons, any medium of advertising or otherwise;

Misleading or untruthful advertising, including use of the term “realtor” by a person not authorized to do so, or using any other trade name, insignia or membership in any real estate association or organization of which the licensee is not a member;

Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit any moneys coming into the licensee's possession that belong to others;

Failing to preserve for three (3) years following its consummation records relating to any real estate transaction;

Acting for more than one (1) party in a transaction without the knowledge and consent in writing of all parties for whom the licensee acts;

Failing to furnish a copy of any listing, sale, lease or other contract relevant to a real estate transaction to all signatories of the contract at the time of execution;

Using or promoting the use of any real estate listing agreement form, real estate sales contract form or offer to purchase real estate form that fails to specify a definite termination date;

Inducing any party to a contract, sale or lease to break the contract for the purpose of substitution in lieu of the contract a new contract, where the substitution is malicious or is motivated by the personal gain of the licensee;

Accepting a commission or any valuable consideration by an affiliate broker for the performance of any acts specified in this chapter, from any person, except the licensed real estate broker with whom the licensee is affiliated;

Being convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state or federal court of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud or any crime or any similar offense or offenses, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to any such offense or offenses;

Violating any federal, state or municipal law prohibiting discrimination in the sale or rental of real estate because of race, color, religion, sex or national origin;

Violating any provision of this chapter, any rule duly promulgated and adopted under this chapter or the terms of any lawful order entered by the commission;

In the case of a licensee, failing to exercise adequate supervision over the activities of any licensed affiliate brokers within the scope of this chapter;

In the case of a licensee, failing within a reasonable time to complete administrative measures that may be required by the commission upon the transfer or termination of any affiliate broker employed by the broker;

Paying or accepting, giving or charging any undisclosed commission, rebate, compensation or profit or expenditures for a principal or in violation of this chapter;

Failing to disclose to an owner the licensee's intention or true position if the licensee, directly or indirectly through a third party, purchases for itself or acquires or intends to acquire any interest in or any option to purchase property that has been listed with the licensee's office to sell or lease;

Engaging in the unauthorized practice of law;

Any conduct, whether of the same or a different character from that specified in this subsection (b), that constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing; or

Violating any provision of the Tennessee Time-Share Act of 1981, compiled in title 66, chapter 32, part 1 or any rule duly promulgated under the Tennessee Time-Share Act of 1981.

The commission may, in addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action against a broker pursuant to this section, order that the broker be downgraded to affiliate broker status.

The director of the division of regulatory boards or the director's duly authorized representatives may, at all reasonable hours, examine and copy books, accounts, documents or records that are relevant to a determination of whether a licensee has properly maintained and disbursed funds from escrow or trustee accounts required under this part. In case of refusal to permit the access accorded by this subsection (d), the director or the director's authorized representatives may pursue the remedies provided by § 4-5-311(b) for disobedience to any lawful agency requirement for information. Refusal shall also constitute grounds for the commission to suspend or revoke a license.

The sole purpose of this section is to provide guidelines for disciplinary actions taken by the Tennessee real estate commission against licensees found guilty of the violations listed in this section.

Whenever any licensee pleads guilty or is convicted of any offense enumerated in this chapter, the licensee must within sixty (60) days notify the commission of that conviction and provide the commission with certified copies of the conviction. The licensee's license shall automatically be revoked sixty (60) days after the licensee's conviction unless the licensee makes a written request to the commission for a hearing during that sixty-day period. Following any such hearing held pursuant to this section, the commission in its discretion may impose upon that licensee any sanction permitted by this chapter.

Whenever the commission revokes or suspends the license of a salesperson, an affiliate broker or a broker, then any school or instructor approval that the licensee holds shall also be revoked. Whenever a licensee surrenders a real estate license, any school or instructor approval that the licensee holds shall also be revoked.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 14; 1981, ch. 372, § 33; 1981, ch. 473, § 12; T.C.A., § 62-1326; Acts 1984, ch. 810, § 4; 1986, ch. 893, § 1; 1988, ch. 919, §§ 7-9; 1990, ch. 946, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 595, § 1.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Real Estate Broker Licensing (Lewis L. Laska), 4 Memphis State U. L. Rev. 457.

62-13-313. Notice — Hearing.

Before refusing to issue a license or suspending or revoking an existing license upon the verified written complaint of any person setting out a cause of action under § 62-13-312, the commission shall, in writing, notify the accused applicant or licensee of its receipt of the complaint, enclosing a copy of the complaint.

The accused applicant or licensee shall, within ten (10) days, file with the commission the applicant's or licensee's answer to the complaint, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the complainant.

If, after investigation, the commission determines that the matter should have a hearing, a time and place for the hearing shall be set.

If, upon review of the complaint or at anytime thereafter, the commission determines that the complaint was not filed in a timely manner or there is no reasonable cause to believe that the applicant or licensee has engaged in the alleged violation or violations of § 62-13-312, the commission shall issue an order to that effect; and a copy of the order shall be furnished to the complainant, the applicant or licensee and the public officers and persons that the commission deems proper.

All notices and answers required or authorized to be made or filed under this section may be served or filed personally or by registered mail to the last known business address of the addressee. If served personally, the time shall run from the date of service and if by registered mail, from the postmarked date of the letter enclosing the document.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the commission shall be necessary to revoke or suspend a license.

In the event the matter contained in the complaint has been filed or made a part of a case pending in any court in this state, the commission may then withhold its decision until the court action has been concluded.

Any complaint filed with the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be filed within the longer of the following:

Two (2) years from the date of commission of the alleged violation of § 62-13-312 or the date that the complainant actually became aware of the violation;

The applicable statute of limitations set out in § 40-2-101, if the violation of § 62-13-312 also constitutes a criminal offense; or

Ten (10) days after a successful criminal prosecution becomes final, if the violation of § 62-13-312 also constitutes a criminal offense and the time required for prosecution of the offense exceeds the time specified in subdivision (e)(1) or (e)(2).

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 16(a); 1980, ch. 451, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-1327; Acts 2006, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act: Procedure Before Hearing (Stephen L. Shields), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 201.

62-13-314. Reciprocity — Service of process on nonresidents.

A nonresident of this state who is a licensed broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson or equivalent real estate licensee in another state may apply for a license as a broker or affiliate broker in this state by submitting appropriate application to the commission.

The nonresident applicant need not maintain a place of business within this state; provided, that the applicant is regularly engaged in the real estate business and maintains a place of business in the other state.

The commission may issue the appropriate license to the nonresident applicant if:

The applicant has qualified for the license held in the applicant's state of residence by written examination;

The applicant meets or exceeds each of the qualifications for licensure in this state;

The applicant certifies that the applicant has read this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter; and

The applicant's state of residence permits the issuance of licenses without written examination to brokers, affiliate brokers and time share salespersons resident in and licensed by this state.

The commission may, in its discretion, refuse to issue, renew or reinstate a broker's, affiliate broker's or time share salesperson's license if the applicant for, or holder of, the license is not a resident of this state.

Every nonresident applicant shall file an irrevocable consent that legal actions may be commenced against the nonresident applicant in the proper court of any county of this state in which a cause of action may arise or in which the plaintiff may reside by service of process or pleading authorized by the laws of this state or by any member of the commission or the director of the commission, the consent stipulating that the service of process or pleading shall be taken in all courts to be valid and binding as if personal service had been made upon the nonresident licensee in this state.

The consent shall be duly acknowledged and, if made by a corporation, shall be authenticated by its seal.

Any service of process or pleading shall be served on the executive director of the commission by filing duplicate copies, one (1) of which shall be filed in the office of the commission and the other forwarded by registered mail to the last known principal address of the nonresident licensee against whom the process or pleading is directed; and no default in any such action shall be taken except upon affidavit certification of the commission or the director of the commission, that a copy of the process or pleading was mailed to the defendant as provided in this subdivision (b)(3), and no default judgment shall be taken in any such action or proceeding until thirty (30) days after the day of mailing of process or pleading to the defendant.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Tennessee real estate commission has the authority to enter into reciprocity agreements with another state, if in the judgment of the commission that state has meaningful requirements for licensure. The reciprocity agreement may authorize the licensure of Tennessee licensees in that state and for the licensure of licensees of that state in this state.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 13(b), (c); 1977, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 870, § 6; 1981, ch. 473, §§ 13, 14; T.C.A., § 62-1330; Acts 1988, ch. 919, § 10; 1989, ch. 89, §§ 17-19; 1997, ch. 36, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Real estate licensing requirements for non-Tennessee residents. OAG 10-90, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (8/2/10).

62-13-315. [Reserved.]

The commission shall keep a register of all applicants for license, showing for each the date of application, name, place of business, place of residence and whether the license was granted or refused.

The register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded in the register.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 19(a); T.C.A., § 62-1335.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Real Estate Broker Licensing (Lewis L. Laska), 4 Memphis State U. L. Rev. 457.

62-13-317. Directory of licensed brokers and affiliate brokers.

The commission may, from time to time, at its discretion, publish a directory of all brokers and affiliate brokers licensed by the commission. The directory shall contain other data that the commission may determine to be in the interest of the public.

The directory shall be mailed to and placed on file in the office of the county clerk of each county.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 19(b); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 754, § 8; Acts 1980, ch. 707, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-1336; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 10.

62-13-318. Temporary retirement.

Upon written request accompanied by the license and the fee for change of status, any real estate firm, real estate broker, affiliate broker, time-share salesperson, or acquisition agent may temporarily retire the license.

If the retiree wishes to remain in retirement for any portion of a subsequent license renewal period, the retiree shall pay the required license renewal fee prior to the license expiration date.

No retired licensee may engage in any act defined in § 62-13-102.

The retiree is responsible for advising the commission of the retiree's current mailing address.

A licensee wishing to reactivate a license from retirement status shall submit the proper form and fee for a change of status.

Reactivation of a temporarily retired license shall not be permitted until the licensee provides proof of completion of sixteen (16) classroom hours in real estate courses as specified in § 62-13-303 during the current license renewal period.

Any license in inactive status with the commission on July 1, 2016, shall be transferred to retirement status on that date.

Acts 1975, ch. 148, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 707, § 3; 1981, ch. 473, §§ 16, 17; T.C.A., §§ 62-1340 — 62-1342; Acts 1982, ch. 864, § 13; 1984, ch. 810, §§ 8-10; 1988, ch. 919, § 11; 1990, ch. 946, § 8; 2004, ch. 456, § 3; 2016, ch. 838, § 10.